District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.19

Aggregate and individual contribution limits of exploratory committees.

(a)

Exploratory committees shall not receive aggregate contributions in excess of:

(1)

$200,000 for a Mayoral exploratory committee;

(1A)

$150,000 for an Attorney General exploratory committee;

(2)

$150,000 for a Chairman of the Council exploratory committee;

(3)

$100,000 for an at-large member of the Council exploratory committee;

(4)

$50,000 for a Ward Councilmember or President of the State Board of Education exploratory committee; and

(5)

$20,000 for a member of the State Board of Education exploratory committee.

(b)

No person, including a business contributor, may make contributions in excess of:

(1)

$2,000 for a Mayoral exploratory committee;

(1A)

$1,500 for an Attorney General exploratory committee;

(2)

$1,500 for a Chairman of the Council exploratory committee;

(3)

$1,000 for an at-large member of the Council exploratory committee;

(4)

$500 for a Ward Councilmember or President of the State Board of Education exploratory committee; and

(5)

$200 for a member of the State Board of Education exploratory committee.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 319, 59 DCR 1862
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 302(c), 60 DCR 15487
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-79, § 2(m), 61 DCR 153

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 added (a)(1A) and (b)(1A).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-79 substituted “No person, including a business contributor, may make contributions” for “Exploratory committees shall not receive individual contributions” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3(c) of the Election Code Conforming Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-143, July 31, 2013, 60 DCR 11799, 20 DCSTAT 1990).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(b) of 20-60 provided that § 302 of the act shall apply as of December 13, 2013.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-79: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-79 provided that the act shall apply upon the latest of: (1) The inclusion of the fiscal effect of the act in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register; or (2) January 31, 2015.

A certification dated February 4, 2015, that the fiscal effect of the Campaign Finance Reform and Transparency Amendment Act of 2013, D.C. Law 20-79, has been included in an approved budget and financial plan was published in the D.C. Register on March 13, 2015 (62 DCR 2988).